Washington statutes.
RCW 41.28.130

Service retirement allowances.

(1) A member, upon retirement from service, shall receive a retirement allowance subject to the provisions of paragraph (2) of this section, which shall consist of:

(a) An annuity which shall be the actuarial equivalent of his or her accumulated contributions at the time of his or her retirement.

(b) A pension purchased by the contributions of the city, equal to the annuity purchased by the accumulated normal contributions of the member.

(c) For any member having credit for prior service an additional pension, purchased by the contributions of the city equal to one and one-third percent of the final compensation, multiplied by the number of years of prior service credited to said member, except that if a member shall retire before attaining the age of sixty-two years, the additional pension shall be reduced to an amount which shall be equal to a lesser percentage of final compensation, multiplied by the number of years of prior service credited to said member, which lesser percentage shall be applied to the respective ages of retirement in accordance with the following tabulation:

Retirement age

Percentage

62

. . . .

1.333

61

. . . .

1.242

60

. . . .

1.158

59

. . . .

1.081

58

. . . .

1.010

57

. . . .

0.945

56

. . . .

0.885

55

. . . .

0.829

54

. . . .

0.778

53

. . . .

0.731

52

. . . .

0.687

51

. . . .

0.646

50

. . . .

0.608

(2) If the retirement allowance of the member as provided in this section, exclusive of any annuity purchased by his or her accumulated additional contributions, is in excess of two-thirds of his or her final salary, the pension of the member, purchased by the contributions of the city, shall be reduced to such an amount as shall make the member's retirement allowance, exclusive of any annuity purchased by his or her accumulated additional contributions, equal to two-thirds of his or her final salary, and the actuarial equivalent of such reduction shall remain in the retirement fund to the credit of the city: PROVIDED, That the retired member will be granted a cost of living increase, in addition to the allowance provided in this section, of one percent commencing January 1, 1968 and an additional one percent on the first day of each even-numbered year thereafter if the U.S. Bureau of Labor Statistics' Cost of Living Index has increased one percent or more since the last cost of living increase in the member's retirement allowance; such increases shall apply only to retirement allowances approved on or after January 1, 1967.

(3) Any member, who enters the retirement system on July 1, 1939, or who enters after that date and who is given the credit for prior service, and who is retired by reason of attaining the age of seventy years, shall receive such additional pension on account of prior service, purchased by the contributions of the city, as will make his or her total retirement allowance not less than four hundred twenty dollars per year.

(4) Any member who, at the time of his or her retirement, has at least ten years of creditable service, as defined in this chapter, and who has attained the age of sixty-five years or over, shall receive such additional pension, purchased by the contributions of the city, as will make his or her total retirement allowance not less than nine hundred sixty dollars per year.

[ 2012 c 117 s 50; 1969 c 31 s 1; 1967 c 185 s 4; 1961 c 260 s 1; 1939 c 207 s 14; RRS s 9592-114.]

NOTES:

Validation—1969 c 31: "Any action effected in accordance with the provisions of the last two paragraphs of section 1 of this 1969 amendatory act during the period of from June 8, 1967 until the effective date of this 1969 amendatory act is hereby declared valid." [ 1969 c 31 s 2.] "Section 1 of this 1969 amendatory act" refers to RCW 41.28.130 above; "the effective date of this 1969 amendatory act" is March 18, 1969.